dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 5891 N 1
SFX 5891 0 lardanmışım .

SFX 5892 N 1
SFX 5892 0 lardansınızdır .

SFX 5893 N 1
SFX 5893 0 larınmış .

SFX 5894 N 1
SFX 5894 0 larınsın .

SFX 5895 N 1
SFX 5895 0 larlayız .

SFX 5896 N 1
SFX 5896 0 'nundu .

SFX 5897 N 1
SFX 5897 0 'nunki .

SFX 5898 N 1
SFX 5898 0 nunkilerde .

SFX 5899 N 1
SFX 5899 0 nunkilerdeki .

SFX 5900 N 1
SFX 5900 0 nunkilerden .

SFX 5901 N 1
SFX 5901 0 nunkilerdi .

SFX 5902 N 1
SFX 5902 0 nunkilerdir .

SFX 5903 N 1
SFX 5903 0 nunkilere .

SFX 5904 N 1
SFX 5904 0 nunkilerin .

SFX 5905 N 1
SFX 5905 0 nunkinde .

SFX 5906 N 1
SFX 5906 0 nunkindeki .

SFX 5907 N 1
SFX 5907 0 nunkiydi .

SFX 5908 N 1
SFX 5908 0 nunkiymiş .

SFX 5909 N 1
SFX 5909 0 nunladır .

SFX 5910 N 1
SFX 5910 0 nunlasın .

SFX 5911 N 1
SFX 5911 0 nunlasınızdır .

SFX 5912 N 1
SFX 5912 0 nunlaydı .

SFX 5913 N 1
SFX 5913 0 nunlaydık .

SFX 5914 N 1
SFX 5914 0 nunlaydım .

SFX 5915 N 1
SFX 5915 0 nunlayım .

SFX 5916 N 1
SFX 5916 0 nunlayız .

SFX 5917 N 1
SFX 5917 0 nunlayızdır .

SFX 5918 N 1
SFX 5918 0 nunlayken .

SFX 5919 N 1
SFX 5919 0 umuzdandır .

SFX 5920 N 1
SFX 5920 0 dalardır .

SFX 5921 N 1
SFX 5921 0 daydıysa .

SFX 5922 N 1
SFX 5922 0 lardaydın .

SFX 5923 N 1
SFX 5923 0 'suna .

SFX 5924 N 1
SFX 5924 0 sundakilerine .

SFX 5925 N 1
SFX 5925 0 sundakine .

SFX 5926 N 1
SFX 5926 0 sundansa .

SFX 5927 N 1
SFX 5927 0 sunundur .

SFX 5928 N 1
SFX 5928 0 sununkiydi .

SFX 5929 N 1
SFX 5929 0 suysak .

SFX 5930 N 1
SFX 5930 0 'yadır .

SFX 5931 N 1
SFX 5931 0 dakiyse .

SFX 5932 N 1
SFX 5932 0 ncasıdır .

SFX 5933 N 1
SFX 5933 0 ncasıydı .

SFX 5934 N 1
SFX 5934 0 ümdekilerle .

SFX 5935 N 1
SFX 5935 0 larımdaydım .

SFX 5936 N 1
SFX 5936 0 larımdaymışım .

SFX 5937 N 1
SFX 5937 0 larınızdaydınız .

SFX 5938 N 1
SFX 5938 0 ylalar .

SFX 5939 N 1
SFX 5939 0 ymuşsun .

SFX 5940 N 1
SFX 5940 0 rmışım .

SFX 5941 N 1
SFX 5941 0 rmışız .

SFX 5942 N 1
SFX 5942 0 irlerdik .

SFX 5943 N 1
SFX 5943 0 suydun .

SFX 5944 N 1
SFX 5944 0 undalarmış .

SFX 5945 N 1
SFX 5945 0 unudur .

SFX 5946 N 1
SFX 5946 0 undaymışçasına .

SFX 5947 N 1
SFX 5947 0 ününkiler .

SFX 5948 N 1
SFX 5948 0 ününkine .

SFX 5949 N 1
SFX 5949 0 ününkini .

SFX 5950 N 1
SFX 5950 0 yeymişim .

SFX 5951 N 1
SFX 5951 0 leriminki .

SFX 5952 N 1
SFX 5952 0 lerinizinkini .

SFX 5953 N 1
SFX 5953 0 nizken .

SFX 5954 N 1
SFX 5954 0 siyseler .

SFX 5955 N 1
SFX 5955 0 lerimindir .

SFX 5956 N 1
SFX 5956 0 leriminkinden .

SFX 5957 N 1
SFX 5957 0 mdendi .

SFX 5958 N 1
SFX 5958 0 msünüz .

SFX 5959 N 1
SFX 5959 0 müdürler .

SFX 5960 N 1
SFX 5960 0 mündür .

SFX 5961 N 1
SFX 5961 0 kilerdeki .

SFX 5962 N 1
SFX 5962 0 kilerdekinin .

SFX 5963 N 1
SFX 5963 0 kilerdin .

SFX 5964 N 1
SFX 5964 0 kilerdir .

SFX 5965 N 1
SFX 5965 0 kilerinde .

SFX 5966 N 1
SFX 5966 0 kilerinden .

SFX 5967 N 1
SFX 5967 0 kilerine .

SFX 5968 N 1
SFX 5968 0 kilerini .

SFX 5969 N 1
SFX 5969 0 kilerinin .

SFX 5970 N 1
SFX 5970 0 kilerinki .

SFX 5971 N 1
SFX 5971 0 kilerinse .

SFX 5972 N 1
SFX 5972 0 kileriyle .

SFX 5973 N 1
SFX 5973 0 kilerledir .

SFX 5974 N 1
SFX 5974 0 kindeki .

SFX 5975 N 1
SFX 5975 0 kiymişsin .

SFX 5976 N 1
SFX 5976 0 südürler .

SFX 5977 N 1
SFX 5977 0 mişlerdi .

SFX 5978 N 1
SFX 5978 0 ümdekiler .

SFX 5979 N 1
SFX 5979 0 ümdekilere .

SFX 5980 N 1
SFX 5980 0 ümdekilerin .

SFX 5981 N 1
SFX 5981 0 ümdekinden .

SFX 5982 N 1
SFX 5982 0 ümdekine .

SFX 5983 N 1
SFX 5983 0 ümdekini .

SFX 5984 N 1
SFX 5984 0 ümdekinin .

SFX 5985 N 1
SFX 5985 0 ümdekiyle .

SFX 5986 N 1
SFX 5986 0 ümdeler .

SFX 5987 N 1
SFX 5987 0 ümdeyken .

SFX 5988 N 1
SFX 5988 0 ümüzdekinde .

SFX 5989 N 1
SFX 5989 0 ümüzdeler .

SFX 5990 N 1
SFX 5990 0 ündekidir .

SFX 5991 N 1
SFX 5991 0 ündekinde .

SFX 5992 N 1
SFX 5992 0 ündekiyle .

SFX 5993 N 1
SFX 5993 0 ündelerdi .

SFX 5994 N 1
SFX 5994 0 ündeydiniz .

SFX 5995 N 1
SFX 5995 0 ündeymişçesine .

SFX 5996 N 1
SFX 5996 0 ünüzdekiler .

SFX 5997 N 1
SFX 5997 0 ünüzdekilerin .

SFX 5998 N 1
SFX 5998 0 ünüzdekinden .

SFX 5999 N 1
SFX 5999 0 ünüzdekine .

SFX 6000 N 1
SFX 6000 0 ünüzdekini .

SFX 6001 N 1
SFX 6001 0 ünüzdekinin .

SFX 6002 N 1
SFX 6002 0 ünüzdeyim .

SFX 6003 N 1
SFX 6003 0 ünüzdeyiz .

SFX 6004 N 1
SFX 6004 0 ünüzdeyken .

SFX 6005 N 1
SFX 6005 0 süydün .

SFX 6006 N 1
SFX 6006 0 ümüzündür .

SFX 6007 N 1
SFX 6007 0 ününkiyle .

SFX 6008 N 1
SFX 6008 0 üysen .

SFX 6009 N 1
SFX 6009 0 lerimdekiler .

SFX 6010 N 1
SFX 6010 0 selerdim .

SFX 6011 N 1
SFX 6011 0 selerken .

SFX 6012 N 1
SFX 6012 0 tüydüm .

SFX 6013 N 1
SFX 6013 0 ndekilerden .

SFX 6014 N 1
SFX 6014 0 ndeysek .

SFX 6015 N 1
SFX 6015 0 nünkinin .

SFX 6016 N 1
SFX 6016 0 sünündü .

SFX 6017 N 1
SFX 6017 0 lerinkilerinden .

SFX 6018 N 1
SFX 6018 0 mişmişim .

SFX 6019 N 1
SFX 6019 0 üzdür .

SFX 6020 N 1
SFX 6020 0 nünkileri .

SFX 6021 N 1
SFX 6021 0 leriyizdir .

SFX 6022 N 1
SFX 6022 0 ümseler .

SFX 6023 N 1
SFX 6023 0 ünkinin .

SFX 6024 N 1
SFX 6024 0 susunuzdur .

SFX 6025 N 1
SFX 6025 0 rlarmışçasına .

SFX 6026 N 1
SFX 6026 0 nızmışçasına .

SFX 6027 N 1
SFX 6027 0 sindendik .

SFX 6028 N 1
SFX 6028 0 lerimizinkiyle .

SFX 6029 N 1
SFX 6029 0 mlaydım .

SFX 6030 N 1
SFX 6030 0 'nınkiler .

SFX 6031 N 1
SFX 6031 0 larımızken .

SFX 6032 N 1
SFX 6032 0 mizdirler .

SFX 6033 N 1
SFX 6033 0 nizdiler .

SFX 6034 N 1
SFX 6034 0 imdelerdi .

SFX 6035 N 1
SFX 6035 0 imdeymişler .

SFX 6036 N 1
SFX 6036 0 imizdelerdi .

SFX 6037 N 1
SFX 6037 0 imizdeydiler .

SFX 6038 N 1
SFX 6038 0 larlarındaki .

SFX 6039 N 1
SFX 6039 0 tenmişim .

SFX 6040 N 1
SFX 6040 0 larımıdır .

SFX 6041 N 1
SFX 6041 0 larınkindeyse .

SFX 6042 N 1
SFX 6042 0 'mizin .

SFX 6043 N 1
SFX 6043 0 lerimizdense .

SFX 6044 N 1
SFX 6044 0 lerimizinkinden .

SFX 6045 N 1
SFX 6045 0 lerinizinkine .

SFX 6046 N 1
SFX 6046 0 undakiyle .

SFX 6047 N 1
SFX 6047 0 mızaymış .

SFX 6048 N 1
SFX 6048 0 'imi .

SFX 6049 N 1
SFX 6049 0 mdeymişler .

SFX 6050 N 1
SFX 6050 0 minkidir .

SFX 6051 N 1
SFX 6051 0 sinesin .

SFX 6052 N 1
SFX 6052 0 'ınmış .

SFX 6053 N 1
SFX 6053 0 ündesinizdir .

SFX 6054 N 1
SFX 6054 0 larımdakinden .

SFX 6055 N 1
SFX 6055 0 'larının .

SFX 6056 N 1
SFX 6056 0 'dalar .

SFX 6057 N 1
SFX 6057 0 mızdırlar .

SFX 6058 N 1
SFX 6058 0 lardasındır .

SFX 6059 N 1
SFX 6059 0 ımdaydınız .

SFX 6060 N 1
SFX 6060 0 ımızdakine .

SFX 6061 N 1
SFX 6061 0 ınızdakiyle .

SFX 6062 N 1
SFX 6062 0 lardanmışlar .

SFX 6063 N 1
SFX 6063 0 larındaymışsınız .

SFX 6064 N 1
SFX 6064 0 mızdaymışçasına .

SFX 6065 N 1
SFX 6065 0 lerimizdeyse .

SFX 6066 N 1
SFX 6066 0 sindeymişçesine .

SFX 6067 N 1
SFX 6067 0 neyiz .

SFX 6068 N 1
SFX 6068 0 ınımdır .

SFX 6069 N 1
SFX 6069 0 umuzdalarmış .

SFX 6070 N 1
SFX 6070 0 ydiyseniz .

SFX 6071 N 1
SFX 6071 0 mizdekine .

SFX 6072 N 1
SFX 6072 0 dıydınız .

SFX 6073 N 1
SFX 6073 0 laraydın .

SFX 6074 N 1
SFX 6074 0 tandıysa .

SFX 6075 N 1
SFX 6075 0 tanmışsa .

SFX 6076 N 1
SFX 6076 0 tansalar .

SFX 6077 N 1
SFX 6077 0 mdanmış .

SFX 6078 N 1
SFX 6078 0 'tılar .

SFX 6079 N 1
SFX 6079 0 mızmışsın .

SFX 6080 N 1
SFX 6080 0 urluğumuz .

SFX 6081 N 1
SFX 6081 0 zsınızdır .

SFX 6082 N 1
SFX 6082 0 sıncadır .

SFX 6083 N 1
SFX 6083 0 nidirler .

SFX 6084 N 1
SFX 6084 0 seymişsin .

SFX 6085 N 1
SFX 6085 0 ündekilerinin .

SFX 6086 N 1
SFX 6086 0 ündekilerse .

SFX 6087 N 1
SFX 6087 0 ünkinde .

SFX 6088 N 1
SFX 6088 0 'undur .

SFX 6089 N 1
SFX 6089 0 ininkilerden .

SFX 6090 N 1
SFX 6090 0 üsünüzdür .

SFX 6091 N 1
SFX 6091 0 muzdakinden .

SFX 6092 N 1
SFX 6092 0 nizdesiniz .

SFX 6093 N 1
SFX 6093 0 inkiyse .

SFX 6094 N 1
SFX 6094 0 inledir .

SFX 6095 N 1
SFX 6095 0 inleyiz .

SFX 6096 N 1
SFX 6096 0 inleyken .

SFX 6097 N 1
SFX 6097 0 lerimleyken .

SFX 6098 N 1
SFX 6098 0 lerdenmişim .

SFX 6099 N 1
SFX 6099 0 erlerdir .

SFX 6100 N 1
SFX 6100 0 sisindir .

SFX 6101 N 1
SFX 6101 0 ndilerdi .

SFX 6102 N 1
SFX 6102 0 iyorduysam .

SFX 6103 N 1
SFX 6103 0 zmişler .

SFX 6104 N 1
SFX 6104 0 zdiyse .

SFX 6105 N 1
SFX 6105 0 ındıysak .
