dictionaries/tr/index.dic
O/219,226,227,1634,1641,2142,2639,2640,3152,3153,3154,5876,5896
Ordu/10,14,24,26,27,49,219,229,320,1098,1634,1639,1643,2126,5923,5930
otuz/11,13,14,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,30,31,32,49,125,128,432,433,434,441,576,661,664,665,796,797,934,1103,1104,1105,1106,1110,1111,1340,1419,1546,1779,2148,2151,2157,2517,3831,4334,5935,5936,5937
öbür/38,39,44,45,46,47,254,255,256,283,329,333,335,339,370,496,499,501,1118,1119,1120,1121,1122,1163,1621,1653,1682,1683,1687,1689,1691,1823,3493,3977,5947,5948,5949
örgütçü/6,35,36,37,38,39,41,256,333,335,494,768,769,770,771,772,1993,1994,4895,6005
özdeş/33,34,35,43,256,261,262,263,264,266,272,275,277,288,318,319,341,527,529,967,968,1183,1184,1197,1261,2153,5977
özel/9999,2,3,4,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,105,252,253,255,256,283,284,319,327,333,335,339,341,373,530,650,651,655,657,666,1441,2400,6017
özen/35,38,83,107,108,109,110,111,112,119,120,255,256,266,267,270,273,274,275,276,277,278,280,281,282,333,335,342,344,526,539,617,618,626,654,671,672,676,678,679,680,683,684,686,691,693,694,696,698,699,700,701,703,705,706,709,710,711,714,717,720,967,968,969,976,1273,1295,1844,6018
özne/9999,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,252,255,256,257,258,259,260,283,284,285,311,313,314,315,316,325,327,329,333,335,338,339,346,349,350,354,355,357,359,360,363,365,374,392,395,414,416,422,424,426,485,530,1183,1453,1505,1515,1669,1671,2247,6021
parçala/17,74,93,94,95,96,102,126,127,129,130,141,148,152,174,175,176,187,192,193,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,208,511,564,594,596,601,609,614,629,813,819,836,6025
Paşa/9,10,14,15,23,27,219,226,227,229,1094,1095,1096,1098,1333,1376,2036,2555,6030
pervane/9999,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,253,255,256,257,258,259,260,284,285,311,313,314,315,316,325,333,335,339,359,415,507,1183,6033
plastik/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,256,283,287,288,318,319,333,335,341,365,1196,6039
psikopat/11,14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,52,61,74,91,92,123,125,135,141,151,163,224,232,321,522,736,870,2342,6041
PTT/237,244,294,298,299,308,309,1538,2287,6042
pür/33,44,45,768,778,1665,1806,6019
rastlaşma/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,125,127,133,153,197,452,811,6047
re/2,3,4,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,53,54,252,255,256,257,258,259,260,283,284,285,311,313,314,315,316,323,335,339,346,348,349,359,361,385,386,387,389,390,391,395,396,399,400,401,402,407,413,422,485,979,1325,1479,1489,1870,1983,1985,2956,3007,3028,3055,3109,3145,6051
Recep/35,303,304,305,306,981,1342,1977,3701,6048
Rıfat/217,222,230,302,6052
sanık/14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,49,50,52,91,92,117,121,122,125,128,140,141,152,163,193,205,210,212,214,223,428,433,439,524,563,574,575,580,583,592,791,804,828,845,934,985,1061,1070,1071,1150,1782,2297,3958,6040
savaşan/11,13,14,15,22,23,25,26,27,29,51,61,117,121,135,224,524,5893
savunucu/14,17,19,23,25,26,27,28,29,49,50,122,123,125,128,178,435,437,442,516,534,580,662,733,796,804,926,961,985,1057,1061,1068,1069,1070,1071,1072,1152,1337,1343,1431,1435,1436,1537,1631,1640,2081,2114,2134,2136,2453,2482,2507,2508,2774,3552,3818,4044,4083,4735,5943
sonuncu/13,14,15,17,19,20,21,23,24,25,26,27,29,54,57,64,65,117,121,125,128,139,178,516,517,534,592,662,785,1337,1343,1434,1435,1436,1437,1536,1537,1552,1640,2081,2113,2114,2134,2136,2284,2386,2464,2466,2482,2501,2505,2507,2508,2774,3414,3552,3818,5715,5929
taba/12,13,16,17,18,20,21,26,27,29,53,57,63,64,65,66,70,90,103,128,131,132,133,464,586,859,1093,1380,1587,1588,1592,2017,2018,2019,2020,2021,2022,2023,2024,2790,2869,5932,6278
tütsü/9999,3,6,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,253,255,256,382,383,769,770,771,1694,1703,1705,5976
U/10,1634,1643,6055
Ulaş/217,222,225,6078
vazgeçilmez/9999,33,34,35,36,38,39,41,255,256,261,262,267,270,272,274,275,276,277,278,283,284,327,328,329,330,331,333,334,335,336,338,339,365,366,371,381,494,501,530,539,544,545,546,548,653,1185,1190,1191,1192,1193,1357,1360,1463,1671,1978,2953,3181,6043
yoğ/11,30,31,32,664,665,1103,1106,1108,1109,1110,1112,1113,1116,1620,1627,2530,2766,2773,2926,3351,3368,3403,3413,3572,3573,3575,3577,3578,3585,3603,3604,4238,5945,6168
